District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.17

Committees.

(a)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a board of directors may create one or more committees and appoint one or more individuals to serve on a committee.

(b)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, an individual appointed to serve on a committee of a limited cooperative association need not be a director or member.

(c)

An individual who is not a director and is serving on a committee shall have the same rights, duties, and obligations as a director serving on the committee.

(d)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide each committee of a limited cooperative association may exercise the powers delegated to it by the board of directors, but a committee shall not:

(1)

Approve allocations or distributions except according to a formula or method prescribed by the board of directors;

(2)

Approve or propose to members action requiring approval of members; or

(3)

Fill vacancies on the board of directors or any of its committees.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09, § 29-1008.10, and § 29-1008.21.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 817 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition